Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Article 7. Office of Trustee.

§ 91-8-701.
Accepting or declining trusteeship.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), a person designated as trustee accepts the trusteeship:

By substantially complying with a method of acceptance provided in the terms of the trust; or

If the terms of the trust do not provide a method or the method provided in the terms is not expressly made exclusive, by accepting delivery of the trust property, exercising powers or performing duties as trustee, or otherwise indicating acceptance of the trusteeship.

A person designated as trustee who has not yet accepted the trusteeship may reject the trusteeship. A designated trustee who does not accept the trusteeship within a reasonable time after knowing of the designation is deemed to have rejected the trusteeship.

A person designated as trustee, without accepting the trusteeship, may:

Act to preserve the trust property if, within a reasonable time after acting, the person sends a rejection of the trusteeship to the settlor or, if the settlor is dead or lacks capacity, to a qualified beneficiary; and

Inspect or investigate trust property to determine potential liability under environmental or other law or for any other purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 44, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-702.
Trustee’s bond.

A trustee shall give bond to secure performance of the trustee’s duties only if the court finds that a bond is needed to protect the interests of the beneficiaries or is required by the terms of the trust and the court has not dispensed with the requirement.

The court may specify the amount of a bond, its liabilities, and whether sureties are necessary. The court may modify or terminate a bond at any time.

A state or national bank, savings institution, or trust company authorized to exercise fiduciary powers and regulated by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, Office of Thrift Supervision, the Mississippi Department of Banking and Consumer Finance, or equivalent state banking supervisors need not give bond, even if required by the terms of the trust.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 45, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-703.
Cotrustees.

Cotrustees who are unable to reach a unanimous decision after consultation among all the cotrustees may act by majority decision.

If a vacancy occurs in a cotrusteeship, the remaining cotrustees may act for the trust.

A cotrustee must participate in the performance of a trustee’s function and consult with the other cotrustees unless the cotrustee is unavailable to perform the function because of absence, illness, disqualification under other law, or other temporary incapacity or the cotrustee has properly delegated the performance of the function to another trustee.

If a cotrustee is unavailable to perform duties because of absence, illness, disqualification under other law, or other temporary incapacity, and prompt action is necessary to achieve the purposes of the trust or to avoid injury to the trust property, the remaining cotrustee or a majority of the remaining cotrustees may act for the trust.

A trustee may delegate to a cotrustee the performance of a function other than a function that the terms of the trust instrument expressly require the trustees to perform jointly. Unless a delegation was irrevocable, a trustee may revoke a delegation previously made.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g), a trustee who does not join in an action of another trustee is not liable for the action.

Each trustee shall exercise reasonable care to:

Prevent a cotrustee from committing a serious breach of trust; and

Compel a cotrustee to redress a serious breach of trust.

A dissenting trustee who joins in an action at the direction of the majority of the trustees and who notified any cotrustee of the dissent at or before the time of the action is not liable for the action unless the action is a serious breach of trust.

A trustee, trust advisor and trust protector shall keep each cotrustee, trust advisor, trust protector and any other fiduciary reasonably informed about the administration of the trust, to the extent the trustee, trust advisor or trust protector has knowledge that each such cotrustee, trust advisor, trust protector or other fiduciary does not have knowledge of the trustee’s, trust advisor’s or trust protector’s actions, or regarding other material information or the availability of such information, related to the administration of the trust that would be reasonably necessary for each cotrustee, trust advisor, trust protector or other fiduciary to perform his or her duties as a trustee, trust advisor, trust protector or other fiduciary of the trust.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 46; Laws, 2016, ch. 396, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-704.
Vacancy in trusteeship; appointment of successor.

A vacancy in a trusteeship occurs if:

A person designated as trustee rejects the trusteeship;

A person designated as trustee cannot be identified or does not exist;

A trustee resigns;

A trustee is disqualified or removed;

A trustee dies; or

A conservator or guardian is appointed for an individual serving as trustee.

If one or more cotrustees remain in office, a vacancy in a trusteeship need not be filled. A vacancy in a trusteeship must be filled if the trust has no remaining trustee.

A vacancy in a trusteeship of a noncharitable trust that is required to be filled must be filled in the following order of priority:

By a person designated in the terms of the trust to act as successor trustee;

By a person appointed by unanimous agreement of the qualified beneficiaries; or

By a person appointed by the court.

A vacancy in a trusteeship of a charitable trust that is required to be filled must be filled in the following order of priority:

By a person designated in the terms of the trust to act as successor trustee;

By a person selected by the unanimous agreement of the charitable organizations expressly designated to receive distributions under the terms of the trust if the Attorney General does not affirmatively object within thirty (30) days of receipt of notice of the person selected; or

By a person appointed by the court.

Whether or not a vacancy in a trusteeship exists or is required to be filled, the court may appoint an additional trustee or special fiduciary whenever the court considers the appointment necessary for the administration of the trust.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 47, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-705.
Resignation of trustee.

A trustee may resign:

Upon at least thirty (30) days’ notice to the qualified beneficiaries, the settlor, if living, and all cotrustees; or

With the approval of the court.

In approving a resignation, the court may issue orders and impose conditions reasonably necessary for the protection of the trust property.

Any liability of a resigning trustee or of any sureties on the trustee’s bond for acts or omissions of the trustee is not discharged or affected by the trustee’s resignation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 48, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-706.
Removal of trustee.

The settlor, a cotrustee, or a beneficiary may request the court to remove a trustee, or a trustee may be removed by the court on its own initiative.

The court may remove a trustee if:

The trustee has committed a serious breach of trust;

Lack of cooperation among cotrustees substantially impairs the administration of the trust;

Because of unfitness, unwillingness, or persistent failure of the trustee to administer the trust effectively, the court determines that removal of the trustee best serves the interests of the beneficiaries; or

There has been a substantial change of circumstances or removal is requested by all of the qualified beneficiaries, the court finds that removal of the trustee best serves the interests of all of the beneficiaries and is not inconsistent with a material purpose of the trust, and a suitable cotrustee or successor trustee is available.

Pending a final decision on a request to remove a trustee, or in lieu of or in addition to removing a trustee, the court may order such appropriate relief under Section 91-8-1001(b) as may be necessary to protect the trust property or the interests of the beneficiaries.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 49, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-707.
Delivery of property by former trustee.

Unless a cotrustee remains in office or the court otherwise orders, and until the trust property is delivered to a successor trustee or other person entitled to it, a trustee who has resigned or been removed has the duties of a trustee and the powers necessary to protect the trust property.

A trustee who has resigned or been removed shall, within a reasonable time, deliver the trust property within the trustee’s possession to the cotrustee, successor trustee, or other person entitled to it.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 50, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-708.
Compensation of trustee, trust advisor and trust protector.

If the terms of a trust do not specify the trustee’s, trust advisor’s, or trust protector’s compensation, and if the settlor, if living, or otherwise a majority of the qualified beneficiaries as defined in Section 91-8-103, have not otherwise agreed with the trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector, a trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector is entitled to compensation that is reasonable under the circumstances.

If the terms of a trust specify the trustee’s, trust advisor’s, or trust protector’s compensation, the trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector is entitled to be compensated as specified in the trust, but the court may allow more or less compensation if:

The duties of the trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector are substantially different from those contemplated when the trust was created; or

The compensation specified by the terms of the trust would be unreasonably low or high.

Factors for the court to consider in deciding upon a trustee’s, trust advisor’s, or trust protector’s compensation shall include the size of the trust, the nature and number of the assets, the income produced, the time and responsibility required, the expertise required, any management or sale of real property or closely held business interests, any involvement in litigation to protect trust property, and other relevant factors.

Subject to the court’s authority as provided in subsection (b), regardless of its form of entity, the fees set forth in the published fee schedule of a trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector that is regulated by the Mississippi Department of Banking and Consumer Finance, the equivalent regulatory agency of another state, the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, or the Office of Thrift Supervision shall be presumed to be reasonable, unless otherwise provided by the terms of the trust.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 51, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-709.
Reimbursement of expenses.

A trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector is entitled to be reimbursed out of the trust property, with interest as appropriate, for:

Expenses that were properly incurred in the administration of the trust, including the defense or prosecution of any action, whether successful or not, unless the trustee is determined to have willfully or wantonly committed a material breach of trust; and

To the extent necessary to prevent unjust enrichment of the trust, expenses that were not properly incurred in the administration of the trust.

An advance by the trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector or by a person named in Section 91-8-701(c)(1) of money for the protection of the trust gives rise to a lien against trust property to secure reimbursement with reasonable interest.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 52, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-710.
Directed trusts.

If the terms of the trust require a trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector to follow the direction of a trust advisor or trust protector, and the trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector acts in accordance with the direction, then the trustee, trust advisor, or trust protector so directed shall be treated as an excluded fiduciary.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 53, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-711.
Directed trusts; accepting or declining fiduciary appointment.

A trust advisor, trust protector, or other fiduciary other than a cotrustee, the cotrustee already being provided for in Section 91-8-701(a), may accept its appointment as the respective fiduciary in a like manner as provided for a trustee under Section 91-8-701(a).

A trust advisor, trust protector, or other fiduciary other than a cotrustee, the cotrustee already being provided for in Section 91-8-701(b), may reject its appointment as the respective fiduciary in a like manner as provided for a trustee under Section 91-8-701(b).

A trust advisor, trust protector, or other fiduciary other than a cotrustee, the cotrustee already being provided for in Section 91-8-701(c), may, without accepting its appointment as the respective fiduciary, carry out the appropriate activities relative to the respective fiduciary as are provided for a trustee under Section 91-8-701(c).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 54, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-712.
Directed trusts; fiduciary’s bond.

Section 91-8-702 applies to trust advisors, trust protectors, or other fiduciaries other than cotrustees, the cotrustees already being provided for in Section 91-8-702.

When exercising its powers under this section, the court shall consider the powers, duties, and liabilities relative to the respective fiduciaries other than a cotrustee and whether any of the respective fiduciaries are excluded fiduciaries.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 55, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-713.
Vacancy; directed trusts.

Except as otherwise provided by the terms of the trust upon obtaining knowledge of a vacancy in the office of trust advisor or trust protector, the trustee shall be vested with any fiduciary power or duty that otherwise would be vested in the trustee but that by the terms of the trust was vested in the trust advisor or trust protector, until such time that the vacancy in the office of trust advisor or trust protector, as applicable, is filled.

The vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as would a vacancy in trusteeship that is required to be filled, either as provided by Section 91-8-704(c) if the trust is a noncharitable trust, or as provided by Section 91-8-704(d) if the trust is a charitable trust. Section 91-8-704(e) shall also apply relative to trust advisors and trust protectors in the same manner as that subsection does to trustees and vacancies in trusteeship.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), a trustee shall not be liable for failing to exercise or assume any power or duty held by a trust advisor or trust protector and conferred upon the trustee by subsection (a) for the one-hundred-twenty-day period immediately following the date the trustee obtains knowledge of the vacancy.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 56, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-714.
Directed trusts; resignation of fiduciary.

A trust advisor, trust protector, or other fiduciary other than a cotrustee, a cotrustee’s resignation already being provided for in Section 91-8-705, may resign its appointment as the respective fiduciary in a like manner as provided for a trustee under Section 91-8-705.

When exercising its powers under this section relative to resignation, the court shall consider the powers, duties, and liabilities relative to the respective fiduciaries other than a cotrustee and whether any of the respective fiduciaries are excluded fiduciaries.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 57, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-715.
Directed trusts; removal of fiduciary.

A trust advisor, trust protector, or other fiduciary other than a cotrustee, a cotrustee’s removal already being provided for in Section 91-8-706, may be removed as the respective fiduciary in a like manner as provided for a trustee under Section 91-8-706.

When exercising its powers under this section relative to removal of the respective fiduciary, the court shall consider the powers, duties, and liabilities relative to the respective fiduciaries other than a cotrustee and whether any of the respective fiduciaries are excluded fiduciaries.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 58, eff from and after July 1, 2014.